ess.foma
define BaseFinalEndings %{t%} e -> n   ||               V _     ["^"]* .#. ,
                        %{t%} e -> t a                                     .o.
                              e -> a   ||                 _     ["^"]* .#. .o.
                              w -> k w || [C - h | %{k%}] _     ["^"]* .#. .o.
                            g h -> q   ||                 _ (w) ["^"]* .#. .o.
                        %{g%} h -> q   ||                 _     ["^"]* .#. .o.
                              g -> k   ||         [? - n] _     ["^"]* .#. ;


define ForeignWordEndingInE e -> a || "-" _ .#. ;


define PreventGemination m -> 0 || .#. [C | V]+ _ "^" m .o. ! tume-ABL_MOD.sg
                         n -> 0 || .#.   a a _ "^" n    .o. ! aane-naqe [Jacobson (2001) p.31]
                         n -> 0 || .#. t u u _ "^" n    .o. ! tuune-naqutke [Badten (2008) p.650]
                         v -> 0 || .#. n u u _ "^" v    .o. ! nuuve-vig [Badten (2008) p.693]
                         s -> 0 ||         s _ "^" m a  .o. ! akmagtesimakanga: +(te)ste-@~:(i/u)ma [Kiiluuq]
                         k -> 0 ||   n a y u _ "^" k    ;   ! ightughqennayukaata: nayuke-COND.INTR [Lvl1: Christmas]


define AssimilateEnclitic [ g | %{g%} ] h -> q || _ ["^"]+ l l u   .#.  .o. ! ["^"]* since [Abs.Sg]+{encl} maps to ^^{encl}
                                      n g -> 0                          ,   ! [Jacobson (2001) p.91]
                                      l l -> l                          ,   ! [Badten (2008) Appendix p.705]
                                        t -> n                          ,
                                        k -> g || _ ["^"]+ n g u q .#. .o.
                          [ g | %{g%} ] h -> q || _ ["^"]+ s a     .#. .o.
                                        t -> s || _ ["^"]+ t a     .#. ;


define CleanupPlaceholders %{k%}   -> 0   .o.
                           %{g%} h -> g h .o.
                           %{t%}   -> t   ;


define CleanupMorphBoundary "^" -> 0 ;

! In Yupik texts, when a foreign word is used with a Yupik suffix, the boundary is typically (but not always) marked with a hyphen on the surface side.
!
! The first clause of the following rule implements this case.
! The second clause implements the case when the boundary is not explicitly marked with a hyphen.
define MorphBoundary2Hyphen "^"  ->  "-" \\ [ "(KnownForeignNoun)" | "(KnownForeignVerb)" | "(GuessForeign)" ] _  \.#. ,,   ! Example: Abraham-nkut
                            "^"  ->   0  || [ "(KnownForeignNoun)" | "(KnownForeignVerb)" | "(GuessForeign)" ] _       ;    ! Example: Abraham

define MarkNullMorpheme [..] -> %{%0%} || "^" _ "^" , 
                                          "^" _ .#. ;
                                          
define CleanupNullMorpheme %{%0%} -> 0 ;                                              

! define DisallowEmptySurfaceMorpheme ~[ ?* "^" "^" ?* ];

define Undoubling l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || _ "^" [ Stop | f |  s]                            .o.
                  l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || [ Stop | f | s | [C - g - %{g%} - w] h ] ["^"]+ _ .o.
                  l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || _ "^" l l                                         .o.
                  l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || [ l l | r r | g g | g h h | g h h w ] "^" _       .o.
                  m m -> m, n n -> n, n g n g -> n g, n g n g w -> n g w       || [ Stop | f | s | [C - g - w] h ] "^" _            .o.
                  m m -> m, n n -> n, n g n g -> n g, n g n g w -> n g w       || [ l l | r r | g g | g h h | g h h w ] "^" _       ;


!==============
! RULE CASCADE
!==============

define MorphophonologicalRules [
    !------------------------------
    ! lexical string rewrite
    !------------------------------
    RewriteSubordinative .o.
    TransitiveIndicative .o.
    SFGKeKa              .o.
    Uteta                .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! modify -te rules
    !-------------------------------
    SpecialTE            .o.
    UnmarkSpecialTE      .o.
    ISuffixTE            .o.
    LabialTE             .o.
    ApicalTE             .o.
    VelarTE              .o.
    DropTE               .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! -e dropping and hopping rules
    !-------------------------------
    ShortRootFinalE      .o.
    LongRootFinalE       .o.
    FinalE               .o.
    SemiFinalE           .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! consonant-related rules
    !-------------------------------
    DropFinalVC          .o.
    DropFinalC           .o.
    DropWeakC            .o.
    DropUvular           .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! allomorphy rules
    !-------------------------------
    AddE                 .o.
    DeleteEBeforeVowel   .o.
    ResolveG             .o.
    ResolveI             .o.
    OptativeAllomorphs   .o.
    ResolveDemAnaphor    .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! phonological rules
    !-------------------------------
    AssimilateConsonants .o. 
    VelarUvularRounding  .o.
    VowelDominance
];

define CleanupRules [
    BaseFinalEndings     .o.
    PreventGemination    .o.
    AssimilateEnclitic   .o.
    Undoubling           .o.
    CleanupPlaceholders  
];

define Rules [
    MorphophonologicalRules .o.
    CleanupRules
];

define RulesforForeignWords [
    MorphophonologicalRules .o.
    ForeignWordEndingInE    .o.
    PreventGemination       .o.
    AssimilateEnclitic      .o.
    Undoubling              .o.
    MorphBoundary2Hyphen
];


!===============
! READ LEXICONS
!===============

read lexc exceptions.lexc
eliminate flag AUX
define ExceptionsNoFlags;
define Exceptions ExceptionsNoFlags;

read lexc parallel.lexc
eliminate flag AUX
define ParallelNoFlags;
define ParallelForms ParallelNoFlags;

read lexc foreign.lexc
eliminate flag AUX
define ForeignNoFlags;
define ForeignWords ForeignNoFlags;

read lexc eng-noun.lexc
define EnglishNouns;

read lexc eng-verb.lexc
define EnglishVerbs;

read lexc eng-other.lexc
define EnglishMiscWords;

read lexc ess.lexc
substitute defined GuessedRootAIU for "(GuessAIU)"
substitute defined GuessedRootEHop for "(GuessEHop)"
substitute defined GuessedRootEDrop for "(GuessEDrop)"
substitute defined GuessedRootGWGHW for "(GuessGWGHW)"
substitute defined GuessedRootUnexpectedlyStrongGH for "(GuessUnexpectedlyStrongGH)"
substitute defined GuessedRootPredictablyStrongGH for "(GuessPredictablyStrongGH)"
substitute defined GuessedRootWeakGH for "(GuessWeakGH)"
substitute defined GuessedRootSemiFinalE for "(GuessSemiFinalE)"
substitute defined GuessedRootTE for "(GuessTE)"
substitute defined GuessedRootSpecialTE for "(GuessSpecialTE)"
substitute defined GuessedRootFinalE for "(GuessFinalE)"
substitute defined GuessedRootFullVGH for "(GuessFullVGH)"
substitute defined GuessedNameAIU                  for "(GuessNameAIU)"
substitute defined GuessedNameGWGHW                for "(GuessNameGWGHW)"
substitute defined GuessedNameWeakGH               for "(GuessNameWeakGH)"
substitute defined GuessedNameUnexpectedlyStrongGH for "(GuessNameUnexpectedlyStrongGH)"
substitute defined GuessedNamePredictablyStrongGH  for "(GuessNamePredictablyStrongGH)"
substitute defined GuessedNameTE                   for "(GuessNameTE)"
substitute defined GuessedNameSemiFinalE           for "(GuessNameSemiFinalE)"
substitute defined GuessedNameEDrop                for "(GuessNameEDrop)"
substitute defined GuessedNameEHop                 for "(GuessNameEHop)"
substitute defined Number for "(DIGIT)"
eliminate flag AUX
define LexiconNoFlags;
define Lexicon LexiconNoFlags;


!----------
! guesses
!----------
define NoGuesses ~[ ?* "(GUESS)" ?* ];
define   Guesses  [ ?* "(GUESS)" ?* ];

define NoForeign ~[ ?* "(FOREIGN)" ?* ];
define   Foreign  [ ?* "(FOREIGN)" ?* ];

define FilteredLex [             NoGuesses .o. Filters .o. Lexicon ];
define GuessLex    [ NoForeign .o. Guesses .o. Filters .o. Lexicon ];
define ForeignLex  [ [ ?* [ "(GuessForeign)" | "(KnownForeignNoun)" | "(KnownForeignVerb)" | "(FOREIGN)" ]?* ] .o. Filters .o. Lexicon ];

define LexicalToIntermediateGrammar [ [ [Exceptions .P. FilteredLex] | ParallelForms ] .o. Rules ];
define LexicalToSurfaceGrammar [ LexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. CleanupMorphBoundary .o. SandhiAndOrthography ];
define LexicalToIntermediateWithPhonology [ LexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. MarkNullMorpheme ];
define IntermediateToSurfaceGrammar [ LexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. LexicalToSurfaceGrammar ];

define LexicalToInitialCapsSurfaceGrammar [ LexicalToSurfaceGrammar .o. Uppercase ];

define GuessToIntermediateGrammar [ GuessLex .o. Rules ];
define GuessToSurfaceGrammar [ GuessToIntermediateGrammar .o. CleanupMorphBoundary ];
define GuessToIntermediateWithPhonology [ GuessToIntermediateGrammar .o. MarkNullMorpheme ];
define GuessIntermediateToSurfaceGrammar [ GuessToIntermediateGrammar .o. GuessToSurfaceGrammar ];

#define ForeignToIntermediateGrammar [ ForeignLex .o. Rules ];
re ForeignLex .o. Rules;
substitute defined GuessedForeign                  for "(GuessForeign)"
define ForeignToIntermediateGrammar;

define ForeignToSurfaceGrammar [ ForeignToIntermediateGrammar .o. CleanupMorphBoundary ];
define ForeignToIntermediateWithPhonology [ ForeignToIntermediateGrammar .o. MarkNullMorpheme ];
define ForeignIntermediateToSurfaceGrammar [ ForeignToIntermediateGrammar .o. ForeignToSurfaceGrammar ];

! define GrammarLower [ [ [Exceptions .P. FilteredLex] | ParallelForms ] .o. Rules ];
! define GrammarUpper [ GrammarLower .o. Uppercase ];

! define BigGrammar [ LexicalToSurfaceGrammar .p. GuessToSurfaceGrammar .p. ForeignGuessGrammar ];

! allows the user to type ASCII arrows and hyphens rather than minus signs
!define GrammarAscii [ LexicalToSurfaceGrammar.i .o. AsciiArrow .o. Minus2Hyphen ].i;

!----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! NOTE:
! grammar that handles
!   * foreign lexical items found in the digital corpus
!   * orthography rules associated with sandhi phenomena, interrogatives, -gw- alternation, vocatives, etc.
!   * numbers [0-9]+
!----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
re [ ForeignWords .o. RulesforForeignWords ] | EnglishMiscWords;
substitute defined EnglishNouns                    for "(KnownForeignNoun)"
substitute defined EnglishVerbs                    for "(KnownForeignVerb)"
define ForeignCorpus;

define FullLexicalToIntermediateGrammar [ [ LexicalToIntermediateGrammar ] | [ ForeignCorpus ] ]; 
define FullLexicalToSurfaceGrammar             [ FullLexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. CleanupMorphBoundary .o. SandhiAndOrthography ]                      ;
define FullLexicalAsciiArrowToSurfaceGrammar [ [ FullLexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. CleanupMorphBoundary .o. SandhiAndOrthography ].i .o. AsciiArrow ].i ;
define FullLexicalToIntermediateWithPhonology [ FullLexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. MarkNullMorpheme ];
define FullIntermediateToSurfaceGrammar [ FullLexicalToIntermediateGrammar .o. FullLexicalToSurfaceGrammar ];

define UppercaseFullLexicalToSurfaceGrammar [ FullLexicalToSurfaceGrammar .o. Uppercase ];
